Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 7. Courts-Martial Jurisdiction.

§ 33-13-151.
Courts-martial classified; composition.

The three (3) kinds of courts-martial in each of the state military forces are:

General court-martial consisting of:

A military judge and not less than six (6) members; or

Only a military judge, if before the court is assembled the accused, knowing the identity of the military judge and after consultation with defense counsel, requests in writing a court composed of a military judge and the military judge approves;

Special court-martial, consisting of:

Not less than three (3) members; or

A military judge and not less than three (3) members; or

Only a military judge, if one has been detailed to the court, and the accused under the same conditions as those prescribed in paragraph (a)(ii) so requests; and

Summary court-martial, consisting of one (1) commissioned officer in the grade of major or above, who shall be a military judge licensed to practice law in this state, or a judge advocate licensed to practice law in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-16; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 16; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 19; Laws, 2017, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 33-13-153.
Jurisdiction of courts-martial in general.

Each force of the state military forces has court-martial jurisdiction over all persons subject to this code. The exercise of jurisdiction by one force over personnel of another force shall be in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-17; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 17, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-155.
Jurisdiction of general courts-martial.

Subject to Section 33-13-153 of this code, general courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code for any offense made punishable by this code and may under such limitations as the Governor may prescribe, adjudge any of the following punishments:

A fine of not more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) or confinement for not more than six (6) months;

A reprimand; or

A bad conduct discharge; or

Dismissal or a dishonorable discharge; or

Reduction of enlisted personnel to lowest pay grade; or

Any combination of these punishments.

A dismissal, a bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge may not be adjudged unless a complete record of the proceedings and testimony has been made, counsel having the qualifications prescribed under Section 33-13-15(2) of this code was detailed to represent the accused, and a military judge was detailed to the trial.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-18; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 18; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 20; Laws, 2016, ch. 404, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 33-13-157.
Jurisdiction of special courts-martial.

Subject to Section 33-13-153 of this code, special courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code, except commissioned officers, for any offense for which they may be punished under this code. A special court-martial has the same powers or punishment as a general court-martial, except:

A fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or confinement of not more than one hundred (100) days for a single offense.

A dishonorable discharge may not be imposed.

A dismissal of a warrant officer or a bad conduct discharge may not be adjudged unless a complete record of the proceedings and testimony has been made, counsel having the qualifications prescribed under Section 33-13-15(2) of this code was detailed to represent the accused, and a military judge was detailed to the trial, except in any case in which a military judge could not be detailed to the trial because of physical conditions or military exigencies. In any such case in which a military judge was not detailed to the trial, the convening authority shall make a detailed written statement, to be appended to the record, stating the reason or reasons a military judge could not be detailed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-19; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 19; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 21; Laws, 2016, ch. 404, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 33-13-159.
Jurisdiction of summary courts-martial.

Subject to Section 33-13-153 of this code, summary courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code, except officers, for any offense made punishable by this code.

Any person given notice of trial by a summary courts-martial may request trial before a special or general courts-martial. The decision to grant this request is reserved to the special or general court-martial convening authority, respectively.

The maximum sentence a summary courts-martial may impose for a single offense is:

A fine of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00);

Reduction to the lowest or any intermediate pay grade, but an enlisted member in a pay grade above E-4 may not be reduced more than four (4) pay grades;

Confinement for not more than thirty (30) days;

Forfeiture of all pay and allowances for any period of confinement;

If found to have willfully or maliciously caused any injury to any person or property, restitution in an amount of Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00) or less; and

Any punishment authorized in Section 33-13-31.

Any person given notice of a trial by a summary courts-martial who fails to appear at trial may be tried, convicted and sentenced in absentia.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-20; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 20; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 22; Laws, 2016, ch. 404, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 354, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 408, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 33-13-161.
Jurisdiction of courts-martial not exclusive.

The provisions of this article conferring jurisdiction upon courts-martial do not deprive military commissions, provost courts or other military tribunals of concurrent jurisdiction with respect to offenders or offenses that by statute or by the law of war may be tried by military commissions, provost courts or other military tribunals.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-21; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 21; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-163.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§33-13-163. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-22; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 22]